Nebraska, session 109, LB969.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB969 LB969
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall develop,
maintain, and make available for public inspection on its website a
database of financial information from all counties in the state. The
information required shall include, but not be limited to, revenue
sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all assets and
liabilities for each county from the most recent audit reports filed with
the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to section 23-1608. The Auditor
of Public Accounts shall designate an implementation date for such
database which date is on or before January 1, 2027.
(2)(a) Counties shall provide to the Auditor of Public Accounts such
information as is necessary to develop and maintain the database.
Counties shall provide updated information to the Auditor of Public
Accounts on an annual basis, and the Auditor of Public Accounts shall
update the database no later than thirty days after receiving any such
information.
(b) Counties shall provide historical financial information
beginning with calendar year 2016 to the Auditor of Public Accounts. Such
information shall be collected and added to the database if available as
soon as practicable.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
Sec. 2. (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall develop, maintain,
and make available for public inspection on its website a database of
financial information from all cities of the metropolitan class in the
state. The information required shall include, but not be limited to,
revenue sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all
assets and liabilities for each city of the metropolitan class's most
recent municipal audit. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall designate an
implementation date for such database which date is on or before January
1, 2027.
-2-

LB969 LB969
2026 2026
(2)(a) Cities of the metropolitan class shall provide to the Auditor
of Public Accounts such information as is necessary to develop and
maintain the database. Cities of the metropolitan class shall provide
updated information to the Auditor of Public Accounts on an annual basis,
and the Auditor of Public Accounts shall update the database no later
than thirty days after receiving any such information.
(b) Cities of the metropolitan class shall provide historical
financial information beginning with calendar year 2016 to the Auditor of
Public Accounts. Such information shall be collected and added to the
database if available as soon as practicable.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
Sec. 3. (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall develop, maintain,
and make available for public inspection on its website a database of
financial information from all cities of the primary class in the state.
The information required shall include, but not be limited to, revenue
sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all assets and
liabilities for each city of the primary class's most recent municipal
audit. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall designate an implementation
date for such database which date is on or before January 1, 2027.
(2)(a) Cities of the primary class shall provide to the Auditor of
Public Accounts such information as is necessary to develop and maintain
the database. Cities of the primary class shall provide updated
information to the Auditor of Public Accounts on an annual basis, and the
Auditor of Public Accounts shall update the database no later than thirty
days after receiving any such information.
(b) Cities of the primary class shall provide historical financial
information beginning with calendar year 2016 to the Auditor of Public
Accounts. Such information shall be collected and added to the database
if available as soon as practicable.
-3-

LB969 LB969
2026 2026
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
Sec. 4. (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall develop, maintain,
and make available for public inspection on its website a database of
financial information from all cities of the first class in the state.
The information required shall include, but not be limited to, revenue
sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all assets and
liabilities for each city of the first class from the most recent audit
reports filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to section
19-2905. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall designate an implementation
date for such database which date is on or before January 1, 2027.
(2)(a) Cities of the first class shall provide to the Auditor of
Public Accounts such information as is necessary to develop and maintain
the database. Cities of the first class shall provide updated information
to the Auditor of Public Accounts on an annual basis, and the Auditor of
Public Accounts shall update the database no later than thirty days after
receiving any such information.
(b) Cities of the first class shall provide historical financial
information beginning with calendar year 2016 to the Auditor of Public
Accounts. Such information shall be collected and added to the database
if available as soon as practicable.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
Sec. 5. (1) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall develop, maintain,
and make available for public inspection on its website a database of
financial information from all cities of the second class and villages in
the state. The information required shall include, but not be limited to,
revenue sources, expenditures, and a balance sheet that contains all
assets and liabilities for each city of the second class and village from
-4-

LB969 LB969
2026 2026
the most recent audit reports filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts
pursuant to section 19-2905. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall
designate an implementation date for such database which date is on or
before January 1, 2027.
(2)(a) Cities of the second class and villages shall provide to the
Auditor of Public Accounts such information as is necessary to develop
and maintain the database. Cities of the second class and villages shall
provide updated information to the Auditor of Public Accounts on an
annual basis, and the Auditor of Public Accounts shall update the
database no later than thirty days after receiving any such information.
(b) Cities of the second class and villages shall provide historical
financial information beginning with calendar year 2016 to the Auditor of
Public Accounts. Such information shall be collected and added to the
database if available as soon as practicable.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a
public record under section 84-712.05.
-5-